Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 10

Nonpartisan Elections

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Former chapter 10, §§7-10-101 —7-10-111, was renumbered as §7-4-201 et seq. [repealed].

Acts 2013, No. 1110, § 9, provided: “The name of Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 10, is changed from ‘Nonpartisan Election of Judges’ to ‘Nonpartisan Elections’. The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make all changes in the Arkansas Code necessary to implement this section.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 1789, § 12: Emergency clause failed. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that Amendment 80 to the Arkansas Constitution becomes effective on July 1, 2001; that this implements the nonpartisan election of justices and judges as mandated by Amendment 80; and that to effectively implement Amendment 80, this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2011, No. 1185, §
21: Oct. 2, 2011.

Acts 2015, No. 268, § 16: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one-year period; that the act entitled ‘AN ACT TO MAKE AN APPROPRIATION FOR PERSONAL SERVICES AND OPERATING EXPENSES FOR THE ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS FOR THE OFFICIAL COURT REPORTERS AND TRIAL COURT ADMINISTRATORS OF THE CIRCUIT COURTS FOR THE FISCAL YEAR ENDING JUNE 30, 2016; AND FOR OTHER PURPOSES.’ requires the passage of this act; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 2015, is essential to the operation of the Administrative Office of the Courts, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 2015, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2015.”

7-10-101. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning definitions, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1110, § 10. The section was derived from Acts 2001, No. 1789, § 1.

7-10-102. Nonpartisan election of judges, justices, and prosecuting attorneys.

(a)

The offices of Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, district judge, and prosecuting attorney are nonpartisan offices.

(b)(1)

The general elections for nonpartisan offices shall be held on the same date and at the same times and places as provided by law for preferential primary elections.

(2)(A)

The names of nonpartisan candidates shall be:

(i)

Included on the ballots of the political parties; and

(ii)

Designated as nonpartisan candidates.

(B)

Separate ballots containing the names of nonpartisan candidates shall be:

(i)

Prepared; and

(ii)

Made available to voters requesting a separate ballot.

(3)

A voter shall not be required to vote in a political party's preferential primary to be able to vote in a nonpartisan election.

(c)(1)

A person shall not be elected to the office of Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, district judge, or prosecuting attorney unless the person receives a majority of the votes cast at the election for the office.

(2)

In a nonpartisan election in which no person receives a majority of the votes cast, the two (2) candidates receiving the highest and next highest number of votes shall be certified to a runoff election, which shall be held on the same date and at the same times and places as the November general election.

(3)

The names of the candidates in a nonpartisan runoff election shall be placed on the same ballots as used for the November general elections.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1789, § 2; 2007, No. 1020, § 20; 2009, No. 959, § 44;
2013, No. 1110, § 11.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted “only” following “containing” in (b)(2).

The 2009 amendment substituted “A person shall not” for “No person shall” in (c)(1).

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

7-10-103. Filing as a candidate.

(a)

A candidate for a nonpartisan office under this chapter shall:

(1)

Pay a filing fee;

(2)

File a petition; or

(3)

File as a write-in candidate.

(b)(1)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall establish reasonable filing fees for nonpartisan offices.

(2)(A)

A candidate for the office of Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, district judge, or prosecuting attorney who chooses to pay by filing fee shall pay the filing fee to the Secretary of State when the candidate files his or her political practices pledge.

(B)

The period for paying filing fees and filing political practices pledges shall begin at 3:00 p.m. on the first day of the party filing period under §7-7-203 and shall end at 3:00 p.m. on the last day of the party filing period under §7-7-203.

(3)(A)

The filing fees collected for the offices of Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, and district judge shall be remitted to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the Nonpartisan Filing Fee Fund for covering the cost of election expenses of the State Board of Election Commissioners.

(B)(i)

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(3)(B)(ii) of this section, the filing fees collected for the office of prosecuting attorney shall be remitted to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the Nonpartisan Filing Fee Fund.

(ii)

The first one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) collected annually from filing fees for the office of prosecuting attorney shall be remitted to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the Trial Court Administrator Fund.

(c)(1)(A)(i)

A person may have his or her name placed on the ballot for a nonpartisan office without paying a filing fee by filing a petition in the manner provided for under this section. A petition for a candidate for the office of Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, district judge, or prosecuting attorney shall be filed with the Secretary of State beginning at 12:00 noon fifty-three (53) days before the first day of the party filing period under §7-7-203 and ending at 12:00 noon forty-six (46) days before the first day of the party filing period under §7-7-203.

(ii)

A nonpartisan candidate filing by petition shall file a political practices pledge with the petition.

(B)(i)

The petition shall:

(a)

Be directed to the office with which it is to be filed; and

(b)

Request that the name of the candidate be placed on the ballot for the election set forth in the petition.

(ii)

A candidate shall not begin circulating petitions earlier than sixty (60) days before the filing deadline.

(C)(i)

The Secretary of State within forty-five (45) days of the filing of the petition shall:

(a)

Determine whether the petition contains the names of a sufficient number of qualified electors; and

(b)

Verify the sufficiency of the petition.

(ii)

The sufficiency of a petition filed under this section may be challenged in the same manner as provided by law for election contests under §7-5-801 et seq.

(D)

A qualified elector signing the petition must be a registered voter in the geographic area applicable to the position at the time he or she signs the petition. Each qualified elector shall provide on the petition his or her:

(i)

Printed name;

(ii)

Signature;

(iii)

Address;

(iv)

Date of birth; and

(v)

Date of signing.

(E)

In determining the number of qualified electors in the state or in any court of appeals district, circuit court circuit, or district court district, the number of votes cast for Governor in the immediately preceding general gubernatorial election shall be conclusive of the number of all qualified electors in the state, circuit, or district for purposes of this section.

(2)(A)

A candidate by petition for Justice of the Supreme Court shall file a petition signed by the lesser of:

(i)

Three percent (3%) of the qualified electors residing within the state; and

(ii)

Ten thousand (10,000) qualified electors.

(B)

A candidate by petition for Judge of the Court of Appeals shall file a petition signed by the lesser of:

(i)

Three percent (3%) of the qualified electors residing within the court of appeals district for which the candidate seeks office; and

(ii)

Two thousand (2,000) qualified electors.

(C)

A candidate by petition for circuit judge shall file a petition signed by the lesser of:

(i)

Three percent (3%) of the qualified electors residing within the circuit for which the candidate seeks office; and

(ii)

Two thousand (2,000) qualified electors.

(D)

A candidate by petition for district judge shall file a petition signed by the lesser of:

(i)

One percent (1%) of the qualified electors residing within the district for which the candidate seeks office; and

(ii)

Two thousand (2,000) qualified electors.

(E)

A candidate by petition for prosecuting attorney shall file a petition signed by the lesser of:

(i)

Three percent (3%) of the qualified electors residing within the district for which the candidate seeks office; and

(ii)

Two thousand (2,000) qualified electors.

(d)(1)

Votes for a write-in candidate in a nonpartisan election
shall not be counted or tabulated unless the candidate or his or her agent gives notice in writing of his or her intention to be a write-in candidate to:

(A)

All county boards of election commissioners in the judicial district; and

(B)

The Secretary of State.

(2)

The written notice shall be given no later than eighty (80) days before the nonpartisan election.

(3)

A write-in candidate shall file a political practices pledge at the same time as filing a notice of intention.

(e)

A candidate for Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, district judge, or prosecuting attorney shall file with the Secretary of State.

(f)(1)(A)

A nonpartisan candidate shall not use more than three (3) given names, one (1) of which may be a nickname or another word used to identify the candidate to the voters.

(B)(i)

A nonpartisan candidate may add as a prefix to his or her name the title or an abbreviation of an elective public office the candidate currently holds.

(ii)

A candidate may use as the prefix the title of a nonpartisan judicial office in an election for a nonpartisan judicial office only if:

(a)

The candidate is currently serving in a judicial position to which the candidate has been elected in the last election for the office; or

(b)

The candidate:

(1)

Is a candidate for the office of circuit judge or district judge;

(2)

Is currently serving in the position of circuit judge or district judge as an appointee; and

(3)

Has been serving in that position for at least twelve (12) months.

(C)

A nickname shall not include a professional or honorary title.

(2)

The person filing for office shall include his or her surname in addition to any given names permitted under subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section.

(3)

The names and titles to be used by a candidate on the political practices pledge shall be reviewed no later than one (1) business day after the filing deadline by the Secretary of State for a candidate for Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, district judge, and prosecuting attorney.

(4)(A)

The name of each candidate shall be printed on the ballot in the form as certified by the Secretary of State.

(B)

The county board of election commissioners may substitute an abbreviated title if the ballot lacks space for the title requested by a candidate.

(C)

The county board of election commissioners immediately shall notify a candidate whose requested title is abbreviated by the county board of election commissioners.

(5)

A candidate shall not change the form in which his or her name will be printed on the ballot after the deadline for filing the political practices pledge.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1789, § 3; 2005, No. 67, § 26; 2007, No. 1049, § 32; 2009, No. 959, § 45; 2009, No. 1407, §§ 1, 2; 2011, No. 1185, § 14; 2013, No. 1075, § 2;
2013, No. 1110, § 12; 2013, No. 1286, § 1; 2015, No. 268, § 13; 2019, No. 527, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “12:00 noon on the first weekday in March and end at 12:00 noon on the seventh day thereafter” for “12:00 noon on the third Tuesday in March and end at 12:00 noon on the fourteenth day thereafter” in (b)(2)(B); and twice substituted “first weekday” for “third Tuesday” in (c)(1)(A)(i).

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 added (f).

The 2009 amendment by No. 1407 inserted “or district court district” following “circuit court circuit” in (c)(1)(E); rewrote (c)(2)(D); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “shall be the same as the party filing period under §7-7-203” for “shall begin at 12:00 noon on the first weekday in March and end at 12:00 noon on the seventh day thereafter” in (b)(2)(B); substituted “the first day of the party filing period under §7-7-203” for “the first weekday in March” in two places in (c)(1)(A)(i); and substituted “eighty (80)” for “sixty (60)” in (d)(2).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1075 rewrote (f)(1)(B)(ii).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1110 rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1286 rewrote (b)(2), (c)(1)(A)(i), (c)(1)(C), (d), (e), (f)(2), and (f)(3)(A).

The 2015 amendment substituted “Administrator Fund” for “Administrative Assistant Fund” in (b)(3)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment inserted (f)(2), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

Cross References.

Nonpartisan Filing Fee Fund, §19-5-1225.